New York, session 2025-2026, A7656.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "respect electoral audiovisual legitimacy (REAL) act". 3 § 2. Section 14-106 of the election law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 5 2-a. (a) No political communication covered by this section shall 6 contain any realistic photo, video or audio depiction of a candidate, or 7 person interacting with a candidate, containing original material 8 created in whole or in part through the use of generative artificial 9 intelligence. 10 (b) For the purpose of this subdivision, "generative artificial intel- 11 ligence" shall mean any technology that engages in its own learning and 12 decision-making to generate new data. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10521-01-5